California statutes. Penal Code
(b) (1) Prior to release of a person under subdivision (a), the prosecutor shall provide notice of the hearing date and pending release to the victim or next of kin of the victim of the offense for which the person was committed where a request for the notice has been filed with the court, and after a hearing in court, the court shall specifically approve the recommendation and plan for outpatient status pursuant to Section 1604. The burden shall be on the victim or next of kin to the victim to keep the court apprised of the party’s current mailing address.

(2) In any case in which the victim or next of kin to the victim has filed a request for notice with the director of the state hospital or other treatment facility, they shall be notified by the director at the inception of any program in which the committed person would be allowed any type of day release unattended by the staff of the facility.

(c) The community program director, their designee, or the independent placement panel, shall prepare and submit the evaluation and the treatment plan specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to the court within 30 calendar days after notification by the court to do so.

(d) Any evaluations and recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall include review and consideration of complete, available information regarding the circumstances of the criminal offense and the person’s prior criminal history.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 60.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

(a) Upon receipt by the committing court of the recommendation of the medical director or designee of the state hospital or other treatment facility to which the person has been committed that the person may be eligible for outpatient status as set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of Section 1602 or 1603, the court shall immediately forward such recommendation to the independent placement panel described in Section 4360.5 of
 the Welfare and Institutions Code, prosecutor, and defense counsel. Notwithstanding any law, the court shall provide copies of the arrest reports and the state summary criminal history information to the panel. The panel shall share the recommendation and copies of the arrest reports and the state summary criminal history information with the community program director or designee.

(b) Within 30 calendar days the independent placement panel or designee shall submit to the court and to the medical director of the state hospital or other treatment facility, a recommendation regarding the defendant’s eligibility for outpatient status, as set forth in subdivision (a)(2) of Section 1602 or 1603 and the recommended plan for outpatient supervision and treatment. The plan shall set forth specific terms and conditions to be followed during outpatient status. The court shall provide copies of this report to the prosecutor and the defense counsel.

(c) The court shall calendar the matter for hearing within 15 judicial days of the receipt of the report described in subdivision (b) and shall give notice of the hearing date to the prosecutor, defense counsel, the community program director, the independent placement panel, and the medical director of the state hospital or other facility. In any hearing conducted pursuant to this section, the court shall consider the circumstances and nature of the criminal offense leading to commitment and shall consider the person’s prior criminal history.

(d) The court
 shall, after a hearing in court, either approve or disapprove the recommendation for outpatient status. If the approval of the court is given, the defendant shall be placed on outpatient status subject to the terms and conditions specified in the supervision and treatment plan. If the outpatient treatment occurs in a county other than the county of commitment, the court shall transmit a copy of the case record to the superior court in the county where outpatient treatment occurs, so that the record will be available if revocation proceedings are initiated pursuant to Section 1608 or 1609.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 61.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

(a) In accordance with Section 1615 of this code and Section 5709.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the State Department of State Hospitals shall be responsible for the supervision of persons placed on outpatient status under this title. The State Department of State Hospitals shall designate, for each county or region comprised of two or more counties, a community program director who shall be responsible for administering the community treatment programs for persons committed from that county or region under the provisions specified in Section 1600.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals shall notify in writing the superior court, the district attorney, the county public
 defender or public defense agency, and the county mental health director of each county as to the person designated to be the community program director for that county, and timely written notice shall be given whenever a new community program director is to be designated.

(c) The community program director shall be the outpatient treatment supervisor of persons placed on outpatient status under this title. The community program director may delegate the outpatient treatment supervision responsibility to a designee.

(d) The outpatient treatment supervisor shall, at 90-day intervals following the beginning of outpatient treatment, submit to the court, the prosecutor and defense counsel, and to the community program director, where appropriate, a report setting forth the status and progress of the defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 30.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1606.

Outpatient status shall be for a period not to exceed one year. At the end of the period of outpatient status approved by the court, the court shall, after actual notice to the prosecutor, the defense counsel, and the community program director, and after a hearing in court, either discharge the person from commitment under appropriate provisions of the law, order the person confined to a treatment facility, or renew its approval of outpatient status. Prior to such hearing, the community program director shall furnish a report and recommendation to the medical director of the state hospital, where appropriate, and to the court, which the court shall make available to the prosecutor and defense counsel. The person shall remain on outpatient status until the court renders its decision unless hospitalized under other provision of the law. The hearing pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be held no later than 30 days after the end of the one-year period of outpatient status unless good cause exists. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1232, Sec. 16.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1607.

If the outpatient supervisor is of the opinion that the person has regained competence to stand trial, or is no longer insane, is no longer a mentally disordered offender, or is no longer a mentally disordered sex offender, the community program director shall submit his or her opinion to the medical director of the state hospital, where appropriate, and to the court which shall calendar the case for further proceedings under the provisions of Section 1372, 1026.2, or 2972 of this code or Section 6325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1608.

If at any time during the outpatient period, the outpatient treatment supervisor is of the opinion that the person requires extended inpatient treatment or refuses to accept further outpatient treatment and supervision, the community program director shall notify the superior court in either the county which approved outpatient status or in the county where outpatient treatment is being provided of such opinion by means of a written request for revocation of outpatient status. The community program director shall furnish a copy of this request to the defense counsel and to the prosecutor in both counties if the request is made in the county of treatment rather than the county of commitment.

Within 15 judicial days, the court where the request was filed shall hold a hearing and shall either approve or disapprove the request for revocation of outpatient status. If the court approves the request for revocation, the court shall order that the person be confined in a state hospital or other treatment facility approved by the community program director. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee. Where the county of treatment and the county of commitment differ and revocation occurs in the county of treatment, the court shall enter the name of the committing county and its case number on the order of revocation and shall send a copy of the order to the committing court and the prosecutor and defense counsel in the county of commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1232, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1609.

If at any time during the outpatient period or placement with a local mental health program pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1026.2 the prosecutor is of the opinion that the person is a danger to the health and safety of others while on that status, the prosecutor may petition the court for a hearing to determine whether the person shall be continued on that status. Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall calendar the case for further proceedings within 15 judicial days and the clerk shall notify the person, the community program director, and the attorney of record for the person of the hearing date. Upon failure of the person to appear as noticed, if a proper affidavit of service and advisement has been filed with the court, the court may issue a body attachment for such person. If, after a hearing in court conducted using the same standards used in conducting probation revocation hearings pursuant to Section 1203.2, the judge determines that the person is a danger to the health and safety of others, the court shall order that the person be confined in a state hospital or other treatment facility which has been approved by the community program director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1232, Sec. 19.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1610.

(a) Upon the filing of a request for revocation under Section 1608 or 1609 and pending the court’s decision on revocation, the person subject to revocation may be confined in a facility designated by the community program director when it is the opinion of that director that the person will now be a danger to self or to another while on outpatient status and that to delay confinement until the revocation hearing would pose an imminent risk of harm to the person or to another. The facility so designated shall continue the patient’s program of treatment, shall provide adequate security so as to ensure both the safety of the person and the safety of others in the facility, and shall, to the extent possible, minimize interference with the person’s program of treatment. Upon the request of the community program director or a designee, a peace officer shall take, or cause to be taken, the person into custody and transport the person to a facility designated by the community program director for confinement under this section. Within one judicial day after the person is confined in a jail under this section, the community program director shall apply in writing to the court for authorization to confine the person pending the hearing under Section 1608 or Section 1609 or subdivision (c). The application shall be in the form of a declaration, and shall specify the behavior or other reason justifying the confinement of the person in a jail. Upon receipt of the application for confinement, the court shall consider and rule upon it, and if the court authorizes detention in a jail, the court shall actually serve copies of all orders and all documents filed by the community program director upon the prosecuting and defense counsel. The community program director shall notify the court in writing of the confinement of the person and of the factual basis for the opinion that the immediate confinement in a jail was necessary. The court shall supply a copy of these documents to the prosecutor and defense counsel.

(b) The facility designated by the community program director may be a state hospital, a local treatment facility, a county jail, or any other appropriate facility, so long as the facility can continue the person’s program of treatment, provide adequate security, and minimize interference with the person’s program of treatment. If the facility designated by the community program director is a county jail, the patient shall be separated from the general population of the jail. In the case of a sexually violent predator, as defined in Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who is held pending civil process under the sexually violent predator laws, the person may be housed as provided by Section 4002. The designated facility need not be approved for 72-hour treatment and evaluation pursuant to the provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code); however, a county jail may not be designated unless the services specified above are provided, and accommodations are provided which ensure both the safety of the person and the safety of the general population of the jail. Within three judicial days of the patient’s confinement in a jail, the community program director shall report to the court regarding what type of treatment the patient is receiving in the facility. If there is evidence that the treatment program is not being complied with, or accommodations have not been provided which ensure both the safety of the committed person and the safety of the general population of the jail, the court shall order the person transferred to an appropriate facility, including an appropriate state hospital. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as authorizing jail facilities to operate as health facilities, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, without complying with applicable requirements of law.

(c) A person confined under this section shall have the right to judicial review of his or her confinement in a jail under this section in a manner similar to that which is prescribed in Article 5 (commencing with Section 5275) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and to an explanation of rights in the manner prescribed in Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

Nothing in this section shall prevent hospitalization pursuant to the provisions of Section 5150, 5250, 5350, or 5353 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) A person whose confinement in a treatment facility under Section 1608 or 1609 is approved by the court shall not be released again to outpatient status unless court approval is obtained under Section 1602 or 1603.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

(a) No person who is on outpatient status pursuant to this title or Section 2972 shall leave this state without first obtaining prior written approval to do so from the committing court. The prior written approval of the court for the person to leave this state shall specify when the person may leave, when the person is required to return, and may specify other conditions or limitations at the discretion of the court. The written approval for the person to leave this state may be in a form and format chosen by the committing court.

In no event shall the court give written approval for the person to leave this state without providing notice to the prosecutor, the defense counsel, and the community program director. The court may conduct a hearing on the question of whether the person should be allowed to leave this state and what conditions or limitations, if any, should be imposed.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 74, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

Any person committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility under the provisions of Section 1026, or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of this code, or former Section 6316 or 6321 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall not be released therefrom except as expressly provided in this title or Section 1026.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1488, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1614.

Persons ordered to undergo outpatient treatment under former Sections 1026.1 and 1374 of the Penal Code and subdivision (a) of Section 6325.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall, on January 1, 1981, be considered as being on outpatient status under this title and this title shall apply to such persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 547, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

1615.

Pursuant to Section 5709.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the State Department of State Hospitals shall be responsible for the community treatment and supervision of judicially committed patients. These services shall be available on a county or regional basis. The department may provide these services directly or through contract with private providers or counties. The program or programs through which these services are provided shall be known as the Forensic Conditional Release Program.

The department shall contact all county mental health programs by January 1, 1986, to determine their interest in providing an appropriate level of supervision and treatment of judicially committed patients at reasonable cost. County
 mental health agencies may agree or refuse to operate such a program.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall ensure consistent data gathering and program standards for use statewide by the Forensic Conditional Release Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 31.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.

The state shall contract with a research agency which shall determine the prevalence of severe mental disorder among the state prison inmates and parolees, including persons admitted to prison, the resident population, and those discharged to parole. An evaluation of the array of services shall be performed, including the correctional, state hospital, and local inpatient programs; residential-level care and partial day care within the institutions as well as in the community; and the individual and group treatment which may be provided within the correctional setting and in the community upon release. The review shall include the interrelationship between the security and clinical staff, as well as the architectural design which aids meeting the treatment needs of these
 mentally ill offenders while maintaining a secure setting. Administration of these programs within the institutions and in the community shall be reviewed by the contracting agency. The ability of treatment programs to prevent reoffenses by inmates with severe mental disorders shall also be addressed. The process for evaluating inmates and parolees to determine their need for treatment and the ability to differentiate those who will benefit from treatment and those who will not shall be reviewed.

The State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and the Department of Justice shall cooperate with the research agency conducting this study.

The research agency conducting this study shall consult with the State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of Justice, and the Forensic Mental Health Association of California in the design
 of the study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 32.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1617.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall research the demographic profiles and other related information pertaining to persons receiving supervision and treatment in the Forensic Conditional Release Program. An evaluation of the program shall determine its effectiveness in successfully reintegrating these persons into society after release from state institutions. This evaluation of program effectiveness shall include, but not be limited to, a determination of the rates of reoffense while these persons are served by the program and after their discharge. This evaluation shall also address the effectiveness of the various treatment components of the program and their intensity.

The State Department of State Hospitals may
 contract with an independent research agency to perform this research and evaluation project. Any independent research agency conducting this research shall consult with the Forensic Mental Health Association concerning the development of the research and evaluation design.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 33.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1618.

The administrators and the supervision and treatment staff of the Forensic Conditional Release Program shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for any criminal acts committed by the persons on parole or judicial commitment status who receive supervision or treatment. This waiver of liability shall apply to employees of the State Department of State Hospitals, the Board of Parole Hearings, and the agencies or persons under contract to those agencies, who provide screening, clinical evaluation, supervision, or treatment to mentally ill parolees or persons under judicial commitment or considered for placement under a hold by the Board of Parole Hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 34.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1619.

The Department of Justice shall automate the criminal histories of all persons treated in the Forensic Conditional Release Program, as well as all persons committed as not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to Section 1026, incompetent to stand trial pursuant to Section 1370 or 1370.2, any person currently under commitment as a mentally disordered sex offender, and persons treated pursuant to Section 1364 or 2684 or Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 37, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.

The Department of Justice shall provide mental health agencies providing treatment to patients pursuant to Sections 1600 to 1610, inclusive, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3, with access to criminal histories of those mentally ill offenders who are receiving treatment and supervision. Treatment and supervision staff who have access to these criminal histories shall maintain the confidentiality of the information and shall sign a statement to be developed by the Department of Justice which informs them of this obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 687, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 3. OF IMPRISONMENT AND THE DEATH PENALTY [2000. - 10008.]



TITLE 1. IMPRISONMENT OF MALE PRISONERS IN STATE PRISONS [2000. - 3105.]



  CHAPTER 1. Establishment of State Prisons [2000. - 2048.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. California Institution for Men [2000. - 2002.]

2000.

There is and shall continue to be a State prison to be known as the California Institution for Men.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

The California Institution for Men shall be located at Chino, San Bernardino County, California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

2002.

The primary purpose of the California Institution for Men shall be for the imprisonment of male offenders who, in the opinion of the department, seem capable of moral rehabilitation and restoration to good citizenship.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2008 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. San Quentin Rehabilitation Center [2020. - 2022.]

2020.

There is and shall continue to be a state prison known as the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center. Any reference to the California State Prison at San Quentin shall be a reference to the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 15.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

The San Quentin Rehabilitation Center shall be located at San Quentin in the County of Marin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 16.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

The primary purpose of the San Quentin Rehabilitation Center shall be to provide humane confinement, rehabilitation and education programming, restorative justice, industrial and other training, treatment, and care to persons confined therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 17.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California State Prison at Folsom [2030. - 2032.]

2030.

There is and shall continue to be a State prison to be known as the California State Prison at Folsom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.

The California State Prison at Folsom shall be located at Folsom, in Sacramento County, California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

The primary purpose of the California State Prison at Folsom shall be to provide confinement, industrial and other training, treatment, and care to persons confined therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Correctional Training Facility [2045. - 2045.6.]

2045.

The Director of Corrections with the approval of the Board of Corrections, is authorized to establish a State prison for the confinement of males under the custody of the Director of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.1.

The prison authorized to be established by Section 2045 shall be a medium security type institution. Its primary purpose shall be to provide custody, care, industrial, vocational, and other training to persons confined therein. However, the Director of Corrections may designate a portion or all of the prison to serve the same purposes and to have the same security standards as the institution provided for by Article 4 (commencing at Section 2035) of Chapter 1 of Title 1 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.4.

The Governor, upon recommendation of the Director of Corrections, in accordance with Section 6050, shall appoint a warden for the California Training Facility. The director shall appoint, subject to civil service, those other officers and employees as may be necessary.

The Director of Corrections may remove a warden at his or her own discretion at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1279, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.5.

The Director of Corrections shall construct and equip in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures and facilities for said institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.6.

The provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) apply to the institution and to the persons confined therein insofar as those provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 111.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. California Correctional Institution in Monterey County [2045.10. - 2045.11.]

2045.10.

The Director of Corrections is authorized to construct and establish a state prison for the confinement of males under the custody of the Director of Corrections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 695, Sec. 11.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

2045.11.

The facility authorized by Section 2045.10 shall be a combination 1,000-bed Level III and 1,000-bed Level IV prison together with a 200-bed Level I support services facility on the existing grounds of the Correctional Training Facility in Monterey County. The provisions of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code that require consideration of alternatives for a proposed project shall not apply to the project authorized by Section 2045.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 695, Sec. 11.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California Men’s Colony [2046. - 2046.6.]

2046.

The Director of Corrections is authorized to establish a state prison for the confinement of males under the custody of the Director of Corrections. It shall be a medium security institution and shall be known as the California Men’s Colony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 421.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.1.

The prison authorized to be established by Section 2046 shall be a medium security type institution. Its primary purpose shall be to provide custody, care, industrial, vocational, and other training to persons confined therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.2.

Any person under the custody of the Director of Corrections may be transferred to the said prison in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 892.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.4.

A warden for the said prison shall be appointed pursuant to Section 6050, and the Director of Corrections shall apoint, subject to civil service, such other officials and employees as may be necessary therefor, and shall fix their compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 892.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.5.

The Director of Corrections shall construct and equip in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures, and facilities for the said prison.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 892.)
-------------------------------------------

2046.6.

The provisions of this part shall apply to the prison and to the persons confined therein insofar as those provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi [2048. - 2048.6.]

2048.

The Director of Corrections is authorized to establish a state prison for the confinement of males under the custody of the Director of Corrections, to be known as the California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi. The California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi shall be situated on such state land as is, as of the effective date of this article, the site of the Tehachapi Branch, California Institution for Men.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.1.

The primary purpose of the prison authorized to be established by Section 2048 shall be to provide custody and care, and industrial, vocational, and other training to persons confined therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.2.

Any person under the custody of the Director of Corrections may be transferred to the California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.4.

The warden for the California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi shall be appointed pursuant to Section 6050, and the Director of Corrections shall appoint, subject to civil service, those other officers and employees as may be necessary.

The Director of Corrections may remove a warden at his or her own discretion at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1279, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.5.

The Director of Corrections shall construct and equip, in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures, and facilities for the California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

2048.6.

The provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) apply to the California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi and to the persons confined therein insofar as those provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration of State Prisons [2051. - 2541.]



  ARTICLE 1. Miscellaneous Powers and Duties of Department and Director of Corrections [2051. - 2068.]

2051.

The department is hereby authorized to contract for provisions, clothing, medicines, forage, fuel, and all other staple supplies needed for the support of the prisons for any period of time, not exceeding one year, and such contracts shall be limited to bona fide dealers in the several classes of articles contracted for. Contracts for such articles as the department may desire to contract for, shall be given to the lowest bidder at a public letting thereof, if the price bid is a fair and reasonable one, and not greater than the usual value and prices.

Each bid shall be accompanied by such security as the department may require, conditional upon the bidder entering into a contract upon the terms of his bid, on notice of the acceptance thereof, and furnishing a penal bond with good and sufficient sureties in such sum as the department may require, and to its satisfaction that he will faithfully perform his contract.

If the proper officer of the prison reject any article, as not complying with the contract, or if a bidder fail to furnish the articles awarded to him when required, the proper officer of the prison may buy other articles of the kind rejected or called for, in the open market, and deduct the price thereof, over the contract price, from the amount due to the bidder, or charge the same up against him.

Notice of the time, place, and conditions of the letting of contracts shall be given for at least two consecutive weeks in two newspapers printed and published in the City and County of San Francisco, and in one newspaper printed and published in the County of Sacramento, and in the county where the prison to be supplied is situated.

If all the bids made at such letting are deemed unreasonably high, the department may, in its discretion, decline to contract and may again advertise for such time and in such papers as it sees proper for proposals, and may so continue to renew the advertisement until satisfactory contracts are made; and in the meantime the department may contract with anyone whose offer is regarded as just and equitable, or may purchase in the open market.

No bids shall be accepted, nor a contract entered into in pursuance thereof, when such bid is higher than any other bid at the same letting for the same class or schedule of articles, quality considered, and when a contract can be had at such lower bid.

When two or more bids for the same article or articles are equal in amount, the department may select the one which, all things considered, may by it be thought best for the interest of the State, or it may divide the contract between the bidders as in its judgment may seem proper and right.

The department shall have power to let a contract in the aggregate or they may segregate the items, and enter into a contract with the bidder or bidders who may bid lowest on the several articles.

The department shall have the power to reject the bid of any person who had a prior contract and who had not, in the opinion of the department, faithfully complied therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2256.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

(a) The department shall have power to contract for the supply of electricity, gas and water for the prisons, upon terms the department deems in the best interests of the state, or to manufacture gas or electricity, or furnish water itself, at its option. It shall also have power to erect and construct or cause to be erected and constructed, electrical apparatus or other illuminating works in its discretion with or without contracting therefor, on terms it deems just. The department shall have full power to erect any building or structure deemed necessary by it, or to alter or improve the same, and to pay for the same from the fund appropriated for the use or support of the prisons, or from the earnings thereof, without advertising or
 contracting therefor.

(b) With respect to any facility under the jurisdiction of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall have the same powers that are vested in the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 30.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a correlation between prisoners who are functionally literate and those who successfully reintegrate into society upon release. It is therefore the intent of the Legislature, in enacting “The Prisoner Literacy Act,” to raise the percentage of prisoners who are functionally literate, in order to provide for a corresponding reduction in the recidivism rate.

(b) The Department of Corrections shall determine the reading level of each prisoner upon commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.1.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall implement in every state prison literacy programs that are designed to ensure that upon parole inmates are able to achieve the goals contained in this section. The department shall prepare an implementation plan for this program, and shall request the necessary funds to implement this program as follows:

(1) The department shall offer academic programming throughout an inmate’s incarceration that shall focus on increasing the reading ability of an inmate to at least a 9th grade level.

(2) For an inmate reading at a 9th grade level or higher, the department shall focus on helping the inmate obtain a general education
 development certificate, or its equivalent, or a high school diploma.
